src/derivation/crk-morphophon.regex
! Alphabet

regex [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô | c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y ] ;
define Alpha

! Rules for changing stem-final characters into the inflection-motivated morphophonemes

set flag-is-epsilon OFF

! set harmonize-flags ON

regex [ w -> "w2", y -> "y4" || [ "@P.infl.NA-4@" | "@P.infl.NI-4@" ] [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ,,
n -> "n3" || [ "@P.infl.VII-1n@" | "@P.infl.VII-2n@" ] [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ,,
[..] -> "@P.infl.VAIae@" || "@P.infl.VAI-1@" _ [ Alpha ]* [ a | â | ê ] .#. ,,
[..] -> "@P.infl.VAIio@" || "@P.infl.VAI-1@" _ [ Alpha ]* [ i | î | o | ô ] .#. ,,
n -> "n3" || "@P.infl.VAI-2@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ,,
[..] -> a || "@P.infl.VTI-1@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ,,
w -> "w2" || "@P.infl.VTA-1@" m o _ .#. ,,
t -> "t3" || "@P.infl.VTA-1@" i _ .#. ,,
w -> "w2" || "@P.infl.VTA-2@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ,,
t -> "t3" || "@P.infl.VTA-4@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ,,
t -> "t3" || "@P.infl.VTA-5@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#.
] ;

! define NA_NI-4_w_w2_y_y4 [ w -> "w2", y -> "y4" || [ "@P.infl.NA-4@" | "@P.infl.NI-4@" ] [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ] ;

! define VII-n_n_n3 [ n -> "n3" || "@P.infl.VII-n@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ] ;

! define VAI-n_n_n3 [ n -> "n3" || "@P.infl.VAI-n@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ] ;

! define VTA-1_w_w2 [ w -> "w2" || "@P.infl.VTA-1@" m o _ .#. ] ;

! define VTA-1_t_t3 [ t -> "t3" || "@P.infl.VTA-1@" i _ .#. ] ;

! define VTA-2_w_w2 [ w -> "w2" || "@P.infl.VTA-2@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ] ;

! define VTA-4_t_t3 [ t -> "t3" || "@P.infl.VTA-4@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ] ;

! define VTA-5_t_t3 [ t -> "t3" || "@P.infl.VTA-5@" [ Alpha ]* _ .#. ] ;

! regex [ "NA_NI-4_w_w2_y_y4" ,, "VII-n_n_n3" ,, "VAI-n_n_n3" ,, "VTA-1_w_w2" ,, "VTA-1_t_t3" ,, "VTA-2_w_w2" ,, "VTA-4_t_t3" ,, "VTA-5_t_t3" ] ;

! regex [ "NA_NI-4_w_w2_y_y4"
! .o. "VII-n_n_n3"
! .o. "VAI-n_n_n3"
! .o. "VTA-1_w_w2"
! .o. "VTA-1_t_t3"
! .o. "VTA-2_w_w2"
! .o. "VTA-4_t_t3"
! .o. "VTA-5_t_t3" ] ;

save stack crk-morphophon.hfst
